dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
SFX T1 rò nto/P0 erò	vt:gerund+simple	# T2 + n[dt]o, pavan
SFX T1 erò anto/P0 erò	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, pavan, metaplaxmo
SFX T1 ir ento/P0 ir	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, pavan, metaplaxmo
SFX T1 ir anto/P0 ir	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, pavan, metaplaxmo
SFX T1 r nde/P0 ar	vt:gerund+simple	# T2 + n[dt]o, liventin
SFX T1 er ande/P0 er	vt:gerund+simple	# T2 + n[dt]o, liventin
SFX T1 erò ande/P0 erò	vt:gerund+simple	# T2 + n[dt]o, liventin
SFX T1 ir ande/P0 ir	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, liventin

# -ér
# group: participle passive
SFX T8 Y 2
SFX T8 er udo/F0F3y0y1 er	vt:participle+passive+weak	# T6 + d[oiae], T6 + ([oiae])
SFX T8 er udi/Pd er	vt:participle+passive+weak is:plural	# T6 + d[oiae], T6 + ([oiae])

# -àr, -ér, '-er, -ír, -ír/is
# group: subjunctive present
SFX T2 Y 37
SFX T2 r n ar	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo, pavan
SFX T2 r m ar	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo, pavan
SFX T2 ar emo ar	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX T2 r mo [ae]r	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX T2 er an er	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo, pavan
SFX T2 er am er	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo, pavan
SFX T2 er imo [^i]er	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX T2 er mo ier	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX T2 erò an erò	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo, pavan
SFX T2 erò am erò	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo, pavan
SFX T2 rò mo erò	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX T2 erò imo [^i]erò	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX T2 erò mo ierò	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX T2 r mo ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX T2 ir emo ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo, metaplaxmo
SFX T2 ar è ar	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5, veneŧian
SFX T2 ar é ar	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5, arkade
SFX T2 er è er	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5, veneŧian
SFX T2 er é er	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5 = T12 + é([dg]?e), arkade
SFX T2 er í er	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX T2 erò è erò	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5, veneŧian
SFX T2 erò é erò	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5 = T12 + é([dg]?e), arkade
SFX T2 erò í erò	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX T2 ir í ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5, ŧenedexe, arkade, veneŧian
SFX T2 ir é ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5 = T12 + é([dg]?e)
SFX T2 e i [^i]e	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i
SFX T2 ete iti ete	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i, metafonèxi padoana
SFX T2 eve ivi eve	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i, metafonèxi padoana
SFX T2 e a e	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + a
SFX T2 0 0 e	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + e
SFX T2 e a e	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + a
SFX T2 0 0 e	vt:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + e
SFX T2 e a e	vt:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX T2 r se ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + e
SFX T2 r sa ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + a
SFX T2 r se ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + e
SFX T2 r sa ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a

# T2, se la fenise par -ie /ie/ (xvie > xvii)
SFX t2 Y 1
SFX t2 e i ie	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i

# T2, se la fenise par -ie /je/ (studie > studi)
SFX t3 Y 1
SFX t3 e 0 ie	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i

# -àr, -ér, '-er, -ír, -ír/is
# group: imperative present second plural
SFX T3 Y 13
SFX T3 ar é/P0 ar	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5, seguxinexe, padoan, viŧentin, polexan, lagunar
SFX T3 ar è/P0 ar	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5, ŧenedexe
SFX T3 er é/P0 er	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX T3 er iè/P0 [^i]er	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T12 + ((i)è|é), veneŧian
SFX T3 er í/P0 er	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX T3 erò é/P0 erò	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5 = T12 + ((i)è|é)
SFX T3 erò í/P0 erò	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX T3 ir í/P0 ir	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5, ŧenedexe
SFX T3 e a/P0 e	vt:imperative+present is:second is:singular	# T9 (a/P0 is done by rule "0 0/P0 e")
SFX T3 e i/PdP0 e	vt:imperative+present is:second is:singular	# T9
SFX T3 ete iti/P0 ete	vt:imperative+present is:second is:singular	# T9, metafonèxi padoana
SFX T3 eve ivi/P0 eve	vt:imperative+present is:second is:singular	# T9, metafonèxi padoana
SFX T3 0 0/P0 e	vt:imperative+present is:second is:singular	# T9, seguxinexe, padoan, viŧentin, polexan, lagunar

# for -ír/is
SFX T4 Y 15
SFX T4 r so/I1 ir	vt:indicative+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + [oe]
SFX T4 r se/I1 ir	vt:indicative+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + [oe]
SFX T4 r si/I3 ir	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i
SFX T4 ir ísis/I3 ir	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + is
SFX T4 r sa/I3 ir	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T10
SFX T4 ir ísas/I3 ir	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T10 + is
SFX T4 r se ir	vt:indicative+present is:third	# T10
SFX T4 r si ir	vt:indicative+present is:third	# T10, đulian
SFX T4 r sa ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + a
SFX T4 r si ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i
SFX T4 ir ísis ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i
SFX T4 r sa ir	vt:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + [ea]
SFX T4 r si/P0 ir	vt:imperative+present is:second is:singular	# T9
SFX T4 r sè/P0 ir	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T12 + ((i)è|é)
SFX T4 r sé/P0 ir	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T12 + ((i)è|é)

# '-er
# group: indicative present second singular
SFX T5 Y 2
SFX T5 er is/I3 er	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + is
SFX T5 r s/I3 er	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T10s = T8 + es, 2s=3, belumat
