dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
blankir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2+0*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xbraveđar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
inbrije/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:inbrijar dp:in
coler/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3W2P0P1xDxFxG-1.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
dalmanŧie/T0t0T2t3T3N0N2L0L2I5	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:dalmanŧiar
enterdíxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xNxOxPxQ	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:inter
maledir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4W0W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple st:maledíxer dp:mal
doer/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W2w2W3w3P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
enpenir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:in
exilie/T0t0T2t3T3N0N2L0L2I5	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:exiliar
antefàŧer/T5T6L5W3P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:ante
faxerò/T0T1T2T3T6N0N1N2N3N4N6L1L2L3L5l1l2l3l5W3w3^4	po:verb vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular st:fàxer
faŧènde/T0t0T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2I5+0*0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:faŧendar
fasènde/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2l0l2I5I7+0*0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:fasendar
inflevelir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4W0W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
ingaxie/T0t0t1T2t3T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:ingaxiar dp:in
dexgradar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:des
grilie/T0t0T2t3T3N0N2L0L2I5	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:griliar
grinbialar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
invidie/T0t0t1T2t3T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:invidiar
joƚer/T0T1T2T3T8l1l2l3w2w3P0P2Vp	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
injutir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2Vp	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:in
arkoatar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:re
koèrxer/T5T6L5l5W3w3W4P0P1P2-1.0*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
konsiliar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
konsiƚie/T0t1T2t3T3l0l2I7.0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:konsiƚiar
krie/T0t0t1T2t2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:krïar
kunie/T0t0t1T2t3T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:kuniar
kuòjer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2@0.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
inlexiarir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:in
xlofar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
xmagise/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:xmagisar dp:s
magrar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2-0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
matremònie/T0t0t1T2t3T3T7N0N2N7L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:matremoniar
nie/T0t0t1T2t2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:nïar
pronunsiar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:pro
in-oridir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
osterïar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
òstïe/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:ostïar
spènđer/T5T6L5W3P0P1.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
pestiƚensie/T0t1T2t3T3l0l2I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:pestiƚensiar
pie/T0t0t1T2t2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:pïar
inpliŧitar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:in
pransar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
pràtege/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2l0l2I5I7A0^7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:prategar
prie/T0t0t1T2t2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:prïar
puoser/T0T1T2T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W3w3P0P1P2-1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
rie/T0t0t1T2t2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:rïar
ríder/T5T6L5l5W3w3W4P0P1P2@0-0^6	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
rie/T0t0t1T2t2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:ríer
salvaregir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2+0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
sfrisar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
sie/T0t0t1T2t2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:sïar
skreŧolar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
skresoƚar/T0T1T2T3l1l2l3w1P0P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
spèŧie/T0t0T2t3T3T7N0N2N7L0L2I5	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:speŧiar
spie/T0t0t1T2t2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:spïar
tatarar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2+0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
sustèñer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xC	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:subs
toɉer/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W2w2W3w3P0P1P2-1.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
stordir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
surmar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
usíder/T5T6L5l5W3w3W4P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
vadie/T0t0t1T2t3T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:vadiar
ekuivaƚer/T0T1T2T3T8l1l2l3w2w3P0P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
raveder/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W2w2W3w3P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:re
intraveer/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W2w2W3w3P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:intra
inveƚupe/T0t1T2T3l0l2I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:inveƚupar dp:in
xveƚupar/T0T1T2T3l1l2l3w1P0P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
xvie/T0t0t1T2t2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:xvïar dp:s
vuojer/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W2w2W3w3P0P1P2^8^7.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
reòlđer/T5T6L5W3P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple is:apheresis st:revòlđer dp:re
